Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 3. Apportionment at Beginning and End of Income Interest.

§ 64.2-1006.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.7; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1007.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.8; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1008.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.9; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.